Maine, session 132, LD2107.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 37-B MRSA §748 is enacted to read:
§748. Maine Nonprofit Security Grant Program
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Hate crime" means a crime in which the perpetrator selected the victim or the
property that was damaged or otherwise affected by the crime because of the race,
color, religion, sex, ancestry, national origin, physical or mental disability, sexual
orientation, gender identity or homelessness of the victim or of the owner or occupant
of that property.
B. "Program" means the Maine Nonprofit Security Grant Program established in
subsection 2.
C. "Serious bodily injury" has the same meaning as in Title 17-A, section 2, subsection
23.
D. "Terror attack" means an attack that causes serious bodily injury or death to multiple
persons or causes substantial damage to a structure and is made for the purpose of
intimidating or coercing a civilian population or to affect the conduct of government.
2. Program established. The Maine Nonprofit Security Grant Program is established
in the agency to provide grants to assist nonprofit organizations to improve security at
property owned or occupied by those nonprofit organizations to protect against hate crimes
and terror attacks.
3. Eligibility. To be eligible for a grant from the program, a nonprofit organization
must:
A. Be a tax-exempt organization under 26 United States Code, Section 501(c)(3); and
B. Demonstrate that the organization or the organization's facilities are at high risk of
a hate crime or terror attack.
Page 1 - 132LR2869(07)

4. Use of grants. A nonprofit organization awarded a grant from the program shall
use that grant for:
A. Physical security enhancements;
B. The cost of security personnel; or
C. The development or enhancement of security plans and protocols.
5. Administration. The agency shall administer the program and shall develop
guidelines and criteria to award grants to eligible nonprofit organizations under subsection
3 using a request for proposals process.
6. Rules. The agency may adopt routine technical rules as described in Title 5, chapter
375, subchapter 2-A to implement this section.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
DEFENSE, VETERANS AND EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT, DEPARTMENT
OF
Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency 0214
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to provide grants to assist nonprofit organizations in
improving security to protect against hate crimes and terror attacks. A portion of allocated
funds may be used by the Maine Emergency Management Agency for program
administration. Any balance remaining in the Maine Nonprofit Security Grant Program,
General Fund account at the end of any fiscal year must be carried forward for use in the
next fiscal year.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $200,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $200,000
Page 2 - 132LR2869(07)